Utah statutes.
72-9-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) (a)  "Commercial vehicle" includes:
(i)  an interstate commercial vehicle; and
(ii)  an intrastate commercial vehicle.
(b)  "Commercial vehicle" does not include the following vehicles for purposes
of this chapter:
(i)  equipment owned and operated by the United States Department of Defense
when driven by any active duty military personnel and members of the reserves
and national guard on active duty including personnel on full-time national
guard duty, personnel on part-time training, and national guard military
technicians and civilians who are required to wear military uniforms and are
subject to the code of military justice;
(ii)  firefighting and emergency vehicles, operated by emergency personnel,
not including commercial tow trucks; and
(iii)  recreational vehicles that are driven solely as family or personal
conveyances for noncommercial purposes.
(2)  "Interstate commercial vehicle" means a self-propelled or towed motor
vehicle used on a highway in interstate commerce to transport passengers or
property if the vehicle:
(a)  has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination weight rating of
10,001 or more pounds;
(b)  is designed or used to transport more than eight passengers, including
the driver, for compensation;
(c)  is designed or used to transport more than 15 passengers, including the
driver, and is not used to transport passengers for compensation; or
(d) (i)  is used to transport materials designated as hazardous in accordance
with 49 U.S.C. Sec. 5103; and
(ii)  is required to be placarded in accordance with regulations under 49
C.F.R., Subtitle B, Chapter I, Subchapter C.
(3)  " Intrastate commercial vehicle" means a motor vehicle, vehicle, trailer,
or semitrailer used or maintained for business, compensation, or profit to
transport passengers or property on a highway only within the boundaries of
this state if the commercial vehicle:
(a)  has a manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination
weight rating of 10,001 or more pounds;
(b)  is designed to transport more than 15 passengers, including the driver;
or
(c)  is used in the transportation of hazardous materials and is required to
be placarded in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Part 172, Subpart F.
(4)  "Motor carrier" means a person engaged in or transacting the business of
transporting passengers, freight, merchandise, or other property by a
commercial vehicle on a highway within this state and includes a tow truck
business.
(5)  "Tow truck" means a motor vehicle constructed, designed, altered, or
equipped primarily for the purpose of towing or removing damaged, disabled,
abandoned, seized, or impounded vehicles from a highway or other place by
means of a crane, hoist, tow bar, tow line, dolly, tilt bed, or other means.
(6)  "Tow truck service" means the functions and any ancillary operations
associated with recovering, removing, and towing a vehicle and its load from a
highway or other place by means of a tow truck.
(7)  "Transportation" means the actual movement of property or passengers by
motor vehicle, including loading, unloading, and any ancillary service
provided by the motor carrier in connection with movement by motor vehicle,
which is performed by or on behalf of the motor carrier, its employees or
agents, or under the authority of the motor carrier, its employees or agents,
or under the apparent authority and with the knowledge of the motor carrier.
